Massachusetts, session 194th, HD6121.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Select
Board in the town of Boylston may appoint a Lieutenant in the Police Department for a term up
to three (3) years. Notwithstanding sections 108A and 108C of chapter 41, and any By-law
adopted under those sections, the Select Board may establish an employment contract with a
Lieutenant upon the same terms and conditions, and subject to the same limitations as contained
within section 108N of said chapter 41, applicable to other municipal employees as designated in
that section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1